Illinois, session 104th, HB2616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-3013 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-3013)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-3013)7    Sec. 3-3013. Preliminary investigations; blood and urine 8analysis; summoning jury; reports. Every coroner, whenever, 9as soon as he knows or is informed that the dead body of any 10person is found, or lying within his county, whose death is 11suspected of being:12        (a) A sudden or violent death, whether apparently 13    suicidal, homicidal, or accidental, including, but not 14    limited to, deaths apparently caused or contributed to by 15    thermal, traumatic, chemical, electrical, or radiational 16    injury, or a complication of any of them, or by drowning or 17    suffocation, or as a result of domestic violence as 18    defined in the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986;19        (b) A maternal or fetal death due to abortion, or any 20    death due to a sex crime;21        (c) A death where the circumstances are suspicious, 22    obscure, mysterious, or otherwise unexplained or where, in 23    the written opinion of the attending physician, the cause   HB2616- 2 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1    of death is not determined;2        (d) A death where addiction to alcohol or to any drug 3    may have been a contributory cause; or4        (e) A death where the decedent was not attended by a 5    licensed physician;6shall go to the place where the dead body is and take charge of 7the same and shall make a preliminary investigation into the 8circumstances of the death. In the case of death without 9attendance by a licensed physician, the body may be moved with 10the coroner's consent from the place of death to a mortuary in 11the same county. Coroners in their discretion shall notify 12such physician as is designated in accordance with Section 133-3014 to attempt to ascertain the cause of death, either by 14autopsy or otherwise.15    In cases of accidental death involving a motor vehicle in 16which the decedent was (1) the operator or a suspected 17operator of a motor vehicle, or (2) a pedestrian 16 years of 18age or older, the coroner shall require that a blood specimen 19of at least 30 cc., and if medically possible a urine specimen 20of at least 30 cc. or as much as possible up to 30 cc., be 21withdrawn from the body of the decedent in a timely fashion 22after the crash causing his death, by such physician as has 23been designated in accordance with Section 3-3014, or by the 24coroner or deputy coroner or a qualified person designated by 25such physician, coroner, or deputy coroner. If the county does 26not maintain laboratory facilities for making such analysis,   HB2616- 3 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1the blood and urine so drawn shall be sent to the Illinois 2State Police or any other accredited or State-certified 3laboratory for analysis of the alcohol, carbon monoxide, and 4dangerous or narcotic drug content of such blood and urine 5specimens. Each specimen submitted shall be accompanied by 6pertinent information concerning the decedent upon a form 7prescribed by such laboratory. Any person drawing blood and 8urine and any person making any examination of the blood and 9urine under the terms of this Division shall be immune from all 10liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred 11or imposed.12    In all other cases coming within the jurisdiction of the 13coroner and referred to in subparagraphs (a) through (e) 14above, blood, and, whenever possible, urine samples shall be 15analyzed for the presence of alcohol and other drugs. When the 16coroner suspects that drugs may have been involved in the 17death, either directly or indirectly, a toxicological 18examination shall be performed which may include analyses of 19blood, urine, bile, gastric contents, and other tissues. When 20the coroner suspects a death is due to toxic substances, other 21than drugs, the coroner shall consult with the toxicologist 22prior to collection of samples. Information submitted to the 23toxicologist shall include information as to height, weight, 24age, sex, and race of the decedent as well as medical history, 25medications used by, and the manner of death of the decedent.26    When the coroner or medical examiner finds that the cause   HB2616- 4 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1of death is due to homicidal means, the coroner or medical 2examiner shall cause blood and buccal specimens (tissue may be 3submitted if no uncontaminated blood or buccal specimen can be 4obtained), whenever possible, to be withdrawn from the body of 5the decedent in a timely fashion. For proper preservation of 6the specimens, collected blood and buccal specimens shall be 7dried and tissue specimens shall be frozen if available 8equipment exists. As soon as possible, but no later than 30 9days after the collection of the specimens, the coroner or 10medical examiner shall release those specimens to the police 11agency responsible for investigating the death. As soon as 12possible, but no later than 30 days after the receipt from the 13coroner or medical examiner, the police agency shall submit 14the specimens using the agency case number to a National DNA 15Index System (NDIS) participating laboratory within this 16State, such as the Illinois State Police, Division of Forensic 17Services, for analysis and categorizing into genetic marker 18groupings. The results of the analysis and categorizing into 19genetic marker groupings shall be provided to the Illinois 20State Police and shall be maintained by the Illinois State 21Police in the State central repository in the same manner, and 22subject to the same conditions, as provided in Section 5-4-3 23of the Unified Code of Corrections. The requirements of this 24paragraph are in addition to any other findings, specimens, or 25information that the coroner or medical examiner is required 26to provide during the conduct of a criminal investigation.   HB2616- 5 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1    In all counties, in cases of apparent suicide, homicide, 2or accidental death or in other cases, within the discretion 3of the coroner, the coroner may summon 8 persons of lawful age 4from those persons drawn for petit jurors in the county. The 5summons shall command these persons to present themselves 6personally at such a place and time as the coroner shall 7determine, and may be in any form which the coroner shall 8determine and may incorporate any reasonable form of request 9for acknowledgment which the coroner deems practical and 10provides a reliable proof of service. The summons may be 11served by first class mail. From the 8 persons so summoned, the 12coroner shall select 6 to serve as the jury for the inquest. 13Inquests may be continued from time to time, as the coroner may 14deem necessary. The 6 jurors selected in a given case may view 15the body of the deceased. If at any continuation of an inquest 16one or more of the original jurors shall be unable to continue 17to serve, the coroner shall fill the vacancy or vacancies. A 18juror serving pursuant to this paragraph shall receive 19compensation from the county at the same rate as the rate of 20compensation that is paid to petit or grand jurors in the 21county. The coroner shall furnish to each juror without fee at 22the time of his discharge a certificate of the number of days 23in attendance at an inquest, and, upon being presented with 24such certificate, the county treasurer shall pay to the juror 25the sum provided for his services.26    In counties which have a jury commission, in cases of   HB2616- 6 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1apparent suicide or homicide or of accidental death, the 2coroner may conduct an inquest. The jury commission shall 3provide at least 8 jurors to the coroner, from whom the coroner 4shall select any 6 to serve as the jury for the inquest. 5Inquests may be continued from time to time as the coroner may 6deem necessary. The 6 jurors originally chosen in a given case 7may view the body of the deceased. If at any continuation of an 8inquest one or more of the 6 jurors originally chosen shall be 9unable to continue to serve, the coroner shall fill the 10vacancy or vacancies. At the coroner's discretion, additional 11jurors to fill such vacancies shall be supplied by the jury 12commission. A juror serving pursuant to this paragraph in such 13county shall receive compensation from the county at the same 14rate as the rate of compensation that is paid to petit or grand 15jurors in the county.16    In every case in which a fire is determined to be a 17contributing factor in a death, the coroner shall report the 18death to the Office of the State Fire Marshal. The coroner 19shall provide a copy of the death certificate (i) within 30 20days after filing the permanent death certificate and (ii) in 21a manner that is agreed upon by the coroner and the State Fire 22Marshal. 23    In every case in which a drug overdose is officially 24determined to be the cause or a contributing factor in the 25death, the coroner or medical examiner shall report the death 26to the Department of Public Health. The Department of Public   HB2616- 7 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1Health shall adopt rules regarding specific information that 2must be reported in the event of such a death, including, at a 3minimum, the following information, if possible: (i) the cause 4of the overdose; (ii) whether or not fentanyl was part or all 5of the consumed substance; (iii) if fentanyl is part of the 6consumed substance, what other substances were consumed; and 7(iv) if fentanyl is part of the consumed substance, in what 8proportion was fentanyl consumed to other substance or 9substances. The coroner must also communicate whether there 10was a suspicious level of fentanyl in combination with other 11controlled substances present to all law enforcement agencies 12in whose jurisdiction the deceased's body was found in a 13prompt manner. As used in this paragraph, "overdose" has the 14same meaning as it does in Section 414 of the Illinois 15Controlled Substances Act. The Department of Public Health 16shall issue a semiannual report to the General Assembly 17summarizing the reports received. The Department shall also 18provide on its website a monthly report of overdose death 19figures organized by location, age, and any other factors the 20Department deems appropriate. 21    In addition, in every case in which domestic violence is 22determined to be a contributing factor in a death, the coroner 23shall report the death to the Illinois State Police.24    All deaths in State institutions and all deaths of wards 25of the State or youth in care as defined in Section 4d of the 26Children and Family Services Act in private care facilities or   HB2616- 8 -LRB104 10405 RTM 20480 b1in programs funded by the Department of Human Services under 2its powers relating to mental health and developmental 3disabilities or alcoholism and substance abuse or funded by 4the Department of Children and Family Services shall be 5reported to the coroner of the county in which the facility is 6located. If the coroner has reason to believe that an 7investigation is needed to determine whether the death was 8caused by maltreatment or negligent care of the ward of the 9State or youth in care as defined in Section 4d of the Children 10and Family Services Act, the coroner may conduct a preliminary 11investigation of the circumstances of such death as in cases 12of death under circumstances set forth in subparagraphs (a) 13through (e) of this Section.14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 15103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-842, eff. 1-1-25.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.